Nebraska, session 109, LB206.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB206 LB206
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701
and section 2 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Criminal Code.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Covered offense means:
(i) Assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, or
assault by strangulation or suffocation under section 28-308, 28-309, or
28-310.01;
(ii) Assault in the third degree under section 28-310 if punishable
as a Class I misdemeanor;
(iii) Robbery under section 28-324;
(iv) Arson in the first, second, or third degree under section
28-502, 28-503, or 28-504;
(v) Burning to defraud an insurer under section 28-505;
(vi) Burglary under section 28-507;
(vii) Theft under sections 28-509 to 28-518;
(viii) Criminal mischief under section 28-519;
(ix) Criminal trespass in the first or second degree under section
28-520 or 28-521; and
(x) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to, aiding
and abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony with
any of the other offenses listed in subdivision (1)(a) of this section as
the underlying offense;
(b) Disaster area means an area that is subject to any of the
following:
(i) An emergency proclamation by the Governor pursuant to section
81-829.40;
(ii) A local emergency declaration under section 81-829.50;
(iii) A major disaster or emergency area declaration by the
-2-

LB206 LB206
2025 2025
President of the United States pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 5121 et seq,; or
(iv) A mandatory evacuation order declared by the proper local,
state, or federal official; and
(c) Emergency period means the period of time that a proclamation, a
declaration, or an order described in subdivision (1)(b) of this section
is in effect. If no end date for the proclamation, declaration, or order
is provided by its terms or otherwise provided for by law, the emergency
period shall be deemed to end thirty days after the date the
proclamation, declaration, or order was issued.
(2) Any person who commits a covered offense in a disaster area
during an emergency period shall be punished by the imposition of the
next higher penalty classification than the penalty classification
prescribed for the covered offense.
(3) If an offense is punishable as a Class I misdemeanor, the
enhanced penalty under this section is a Class IV felony.
(4) The allegations supporting an enhancement under this section
shall be set forth in the indictment or information, and it shall be the
burden of the prosecuting attorney to prove such allegations beyond a
reasonable doubt to the judge or jury in the state's case in chief.
Sec. 3. Original section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-